North Carolina statutes. Chapter 156. Drainage.
Article 8. Assessments and Bond Issue.
§ 156-112.
Duty of treasurer to make payment; penalty.

It shall be the duty of the treasurer, and without any previous order from the board of drainage commissioners, to provide and pay the installments of interest at the time and place as evidenced by the coupons attached to the bonds, and also to pay the annual installments of the principal due on the bonds at the time and place as evidenced by the bonds. The treasurer shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if he shall willfully fail to make prompt payments of the interest and principal of the bonds, and he shall likewise be liable in a civil action for all damages which may accrue either to the board of drainage commissioners or to the holder of such bonds, to either or both of whom a right of action is hereby given.

History.

1911, c. 67, s. 12; C.S., s. 5368; 1963, c. 767, s. 4; 1993, c. 539, s. 1077; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Cross References.

As to treasurers of drainage districts, see now

G.S. 156-81.1

§ 156-113.
Fees for collection and disbursement.

The fee allowed the sheriff or tax collector for collecting the drainage tax as hereinbefore prescribed shall be two percent (2%) of the amount collected, and the fee allowed the treasurer for disbursing the revenue obtained from the sale of drainage bonds shall be one percent (1%) of the amount disbursed: Provided, that no fee shall be allowed the sheriff or tax collector or treasurer for collecting or receiving the revenue obtained from the sale of the bonds hereinbefore provided for, nor for disbursing the revenue raised or paying off such bonds; provided, that where the sheriff, tax collector or treasurer is on a salary basis, the fees herein set out shall not be charged.

History.

1911, c. 67, s. 13; C.S., s. 5369; 1925, c. 271, s. 1; 1957, c. 562; 1963, c. 767, s. 4.

Local Modification.

Pitt: 1925, c. 271, s. 2.

§ 156-114.
Conveyance of land; change in assessment roll; procedure.

Status of Land Fixed. — The boundaries of lands as surveyed and mapped, the ownership thereof, and the classification and assessment thereof as appears in the final report and map and upon the assessment roll, shall be and remain as of the time when the district was established and the final report of the board of viewers was approved by the court. No conveyance or devise of land or devolution by inheritance after the petition has been filed or the owner thereof has been served with the original summons, either by personal service or by publication, shall affect the status or liability of such land as a part of such drainage district, except as herein provided.

Conveyance before Final Report. — If the owner of any lands included in such district shall, after the filing of the petition, and after being served with the original summons and before the approval of the final report, convey the whole or any part of such lands, or the title thereto shall be otherwise changed, then and in such event the grantor and grantee or new owner, or either, may file a petition in an ancillary proceeding before the clerk of the superior court setting forth the facts, with a description of the lands conveyed either in part or the entire body of land, together with a description of the land excepted and not conveyed. If the grantor or grantee or new owner, in whole or in part, file such petition, the other not so joining shall be served with notice of same. The clerk may require the petitioner to attach to the petition a map showing the boundaries of the entire body of land as it appears in the record of the proceedings, and also showing the part conveyed. If the ownership of such land has been changed by devise or inheritance, or any joint ownership has been changed by partition, such new owner may file a petition as herein provided. Such petition shall conclude with a prayer that the grantee or new owner be made a party to the proceeding. The court after a hearing may make the grantee or new owner a party to the drainage proceeding and shall certify to the engineer and viewers a description of the land so conveyed or held by the new owner, with directions to verify the boundaries and to classify the land to the same extent as if the grantee was the original party. Any part of such lands not so conveyed shall be and remain a part of the district.

Conveyance after District Established. — After the district shall be established, the lands classified, the final report approved, and the assessment roll filed, no conveyance of any land in the district shall affect or change the existing status or liability of such land as to assessment charges or otherwise, except in the manner herein defined. When the title and ownership of any tract of land embraced in the district have been changed or vested in others by grant, devise, or inheritance, or by partition between joint owners, subsequent to the establishment of the district, the assessment roll may be amended in the following manner: The grantor and grantee, or the new owners, may file a petition with the chairman of the board of drainage commissioners alleging that the ownership of the land has changed, and the manner thereof, in whole or in part. If the whole body of land as appears in the final report or on the assessment roll has changed ownership, a general description consistent with such final report and map shall be sufficient. If the ownership of the body of land has changed only as to part thereof, the petition shall contain a description of the part thereof claimed by the new owners, and the number of acres and the classifications, or the several classes if it be in more than one class, and also a description of that part of the land the title to which remains in the original owner, with the number of acres and with the classification and the several classes if it contains more than one class of land. The petition shall so describe the land and the number of acres in each class as to that part of which the ownership has changed as to maintain the number of acres originally assessed, and the class or classes in which the same has been assessed, and the chairman of the board of drainage commissioners may require the petitioners to have the lands surveyed, and submit a map if the same shall be necessary.

Duty of Chairman of Drainage Commissioners and Clerk. — The chairman of the board of drainage commissioners shall present this petition to the clerk of the superior court at any time thereafter, not later than the first Monday in July following. It shall be the duty of the clerk to examine and verify the facts set forth in the petition, and particularly to determine if the number of acres assessed and the classes thereof against the new owners added to the number of acres and the classes assessed against that part of the land, the title to which has not changed, shall equal the total number of acres and the classes so assessed as appear against such entire body of land in the final report and assessment roll. If the clerk shall be so satisfied, he shall enter an order or decree changing the original assessment roll, or the assessment roll as theretofore amended, by adding the name of the new owner with the number of acres assessed in each class, and by amending the number of acres assessed and the classes thereof against the original owner as appears on the original assessment roll or assessment roll as theretofore amended. It shall be the duty of the clerk after such order to make such changes in the assessment roll. It shall be the duty of the clerk of the superior court in making changes in the original assessment roll from time to time to observe and maintain the total number of acres in each class, to the end that the revenue produced from the annual assessment shall not be thereby diminished. The chairman of the board of drainage commissioners, instead of presenting to the clerk of the court each petition of landowners separately, may combine a number of petitions and present the same to the court at one and the same time. The first Monday in July in each year is hereby set apart as a special day on which petitions for changing the assessment roll may be submitted, at which time the clerk shall hear all petitions not theretofore submitted.

Failure of Chairman of Board to Act. — If the chairman of the board of drainage commissioners shall fail to act when any petition shall be submitted to him as herein provided, or the chairman or any member of the board shall fail to discharge any duty imposed by this section or any other provision of the general drainage law, it is hereby made the duty of the clerk of the superior court, either independently or upon the request of any landowner in the district, to cite such chairman or member to appear before him upon a certain day and show cause why he should not be removed from office, and unless good cause be shown, it shall be the duty of the clerk to remove the chairman or any member of the board of drainage commissioners and to certify his action, to the end that another member may be elected according to law. If the failure of the chairman or any member of the board of drainage commissioners to discharge such duty shall be willful, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

When Owner May File Petition with Clerk. — If the grantor and grantee, or all those claiming to have acquired title to any body of land on the assessment roll and whose assessment will be affected, cannot agree upon joinder in a petition to the chairman of the board of drainage commissioners, or if the said chairman fails within a reasonable time to discharge his duty by presenting the petition to the court, then either party interested in the tract of land as it appears on the assessment roll may file a petition with the clerk of the superior court setting forth the facts as to the change in ownership and title of such land, with the description of the entire tract of land and the number of acres in each class, together with a description of that part of the land as to which the ownership has changed, with the number of acres in each class, and pray the court to order that the assessment roll be amended in accordance with the title and interest of the several owners. At the time of filing the petition a summons shall issue to the other parties interested in the tract of land to show cause, on a day certain, why the prayer of the petition should not be granted. Upon the return day the clerk of the court shall hear all the evidence, find the facts, and enter up a judgment directing the appropriate amendment to the assessment roll. It shall be the duty of the clerk to amend the assessment roll in accordance with his judgment.

Effect of Change in Assessment Roll. — No judgment or amendment of the assessment roll shall be valid unless the number of acres and the classes assessed against the original and new owners shall equal the area and classification as contained in the tract of land as it appears on the original assessment roll. This petition may be presented to the court at any time, but the first Monday in July in each year is hereby designated as the day upon which all petitions for amendments to the assessment roll may be submitted. Any amendments to the assessment roll ordered after the last day of August in each year shall not become effective until the first day of September the following year, and the assessment roll as it appears on the first day of September of each year shall constitute the assessment roll to be delivered to the sheriff on the first Monday in September, and he shall collect the drainage assessments as they appear thereon without regard to any changes in title or ownership or any changes in the assessment roll made by the court after the thirty-first day of August. All amendments sought to be made to the assessment roll shall have reference to the assessment roll as it appears at the time the amendment is sought, which shall be either the original assessment roll or as amended; but it shall be the duty of the clerk of the superior court to examine frequently the assessment roll as amended, and before the same shall be further amended, and make certain that the aggregate number of acres in each class as appeared on the original assessment roll shall not be reduced, nor the aggregate annual assessments reduced. Any amendments ordered shall be made on the assessment roll and become due in the following September, and on all subsequent assessment rolls which have not become due or collectible.

Clerk to Prepare New Assessment Rolls. — It shall be the duty of the chairman and the secretary of the board of drainage commissioners of the district to render to the clerk of the court any clerical assistance involved in changes in the assessment rolls, but the primary duty and responsibility in making such amendments shall remain with the clerk of the superior court, and he shall be held liable for any error or omission which may work a loss to the district or the bondholders. If such amendments to the assessment rolls shall make necessary the preparation of new assessment rolls, the clerk of the superior court shall be required to prepare such new assessment rolls with the clerical assistance of the chairman and secretary of the board of drainage commissioners, and such new assessment rolls shall be signed by the chairman and secretary of the board of drainage commissioners and by the clerk of the superior court before delivery to the sheriff or tax collector as required upon the original assessment rolls. The original assessment rolls shall be preserved by the clerk of the court among his records for future reference.

Number of Copies. — In the event it shall be necessary to prepare new assessment rolls, the clerk shall prepare four copies, one copy for the drainage record, another for the sheriff or tax collector, another for the chairman of the board of drainage commissioners, and the other for filing and preserving among the records, and which fourth copy shall never be mutilated or interlined, but shall be preserved in its original form for reference. As to all drainage districts heretofore established, the clerk of the court shall prepare an additional copy of all the original assessment rolls for the several years the lands in such districts are assessed and securely preserve the same, at least until all outstanding bonds of the district shall be paid, to the end that they may always be accessible for reference and comparison. It shall not be necessary hereafter to deliver to the sheriff or tax collector a copy of the assessment roll for the current year in which assessments are due and payable, but the copy provided for him may remain among the records of the clerk of the court for safekeeping and reference by him.

Costs Determined. — As compensation to the clerk of the court for the performance of duties imposed herein, he shall be paid such sum by the board of drainage commissioners of such drainage district as they may deem fair and adequate, and the same is hereby declared a proper charge against said district, but no additional compensation shall be paid to the clerk in those counties where he receives a salary in lieu of fees. Any costs which may accrue in amendments to the assessment rolls shall be adjudged against the parties in interest, in the discretion of the clerk, and such costs shall be paid before the amendment shall become effective. As to all petitions which shall be filed and submitted to the court on the first Monday in July, no costs shall be paid or adjudged against any party in those counties where the clerk and sheriff receive a salary in lieu of fees.

Chairman Represents Board. — As to all petitions filed with the chairman of the board of drainage commissioners, or as to the discharge of any duty by the chairman required of him under the general drainage law, he shall be presumed to act for the board, and the chairman shall do all things necessary to protect and maintain the interests of the drainage district. If the chairman shall be or become a landowner in the drainage district and may desire an amendment to the assessment rolls, he may file his petition before any other member of the board, or file the same directly with the clerk of the superior court.

Application of Section. — The provisions of this section shall apply to landowners in districts heretofore established and to drainage proceedings heretofore instituted to the same extent as to drainage proceedings hereafter instituted and established.

History.

1917, c. 152, s. 4; 1919, c. 208, s. 1; C.S., s. 5370; 1993, c. 539, s. 1078; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 156-115.
Warranty in deed runs to purchaser who pays assessment.

Where the land assessed by drainage commissioners under the provisions of this Article has been purchased since the making of the assessment by a purchaser for value without notice under a deed of general warranty, and said purchaser pays to the sheriff the amount of said drainage assessment, which is a lien on the land purchased, then such purchaser who pays the said drainage assessment shall have a right of action against the warrantor of his title under the covenant of general warranty contained in his deed for the recovery of the amount paid.

History.

1919, c. 282, s. 3; C.S., s. 5371.

§ 156-116.
Modification of assessments.

Relevy. — Where the court has confirmed an assessment for the construction of any public levee, ditch, or drain, and such assessment has been modified by the court of superior jurisdiction, but for some unforeseen cause it cannot be collected, the board of drainage commissioners shall have power to change or modify the assessment as originally confirmed to conform to the judgment of the superior court and to cover any deficit that may have been caused by the order of court or unforeseen occurrence. The relevy shall be made for the additional sum required, in the same ratio on the lands benefited as the original assessment was made.

Upon Sale of Land for Assessments. — If any person, or any number of persons, claiming to have title to any tract or tracts of land subject to assessment or drainage tax shall fail to pay any annual assessment levied against such lands, and the sheriff or tax collector shall be compelled to sell such lands under the law for the purpose of making such collection, the net proceeds of such sale shall be paid to the treasurer, to be held by him and disbursed for the purpose of paying the current assessment and future annual assessments so far as the proceeds may be sufficient. When the fund in the custody of the treasurer shall be exhausted in the payment of annual assessments against such lands, or there shall not be a sufficient sum to pay the next annual assessment, the treasurer shall immediately give written notice to that effect to the chairman of the board of drainage commissioners of the district, and also to the clerk of the superior court, whereupon the board of drainage commissioners shall institute an investigation of such tract or tracts of land to determine the market value, and if they shall find that the market value is not equal to all the future annual assessments to cover its share of installments of principal and interest on the outstanding bonds, they shall proceed, with the approval of the clerk of the superior court, to make new reassessment rolls on all the remaining lands in the district and increase the sum in sufficient sums to equal the deficit thereby created and such new assessment rolls shall constitute the future assessment rolls until changed according to law, and shall be certified to the tax collector as herein provided in lieu of the former assessment rolls. However, the tract or tracts of land which have been so sold by the tax collector shall continue on the assessment roll in the name of the new owner, but reassessed upon the new basis, and the drainage tax collected at the same time and in the same manner as other lands as long as such lands may have sufficient market value out of which to collect the annual drainage tax, and when such lands shall cease to have such value, or shall be abandoned by the person claiming title thereto, the drainage commissioners may omit the same from the assessment roll with the approval of the clerk of the superior court, but such lands may in the same manner at any time in the future be restored to the assessment rolls.

Surplus Funds. — If the funds in the hands of the treasurer at any time, arising under this section or in any other manner, shall be greater than is necessary to pay the annual installments of principal and interest, or the annual cost of maintenance of the drainage works, or both, such surplus shall be held by the treasurer for future disbursement for other purposes as herein provided or subject to the order of the board of drainage commissioners.

Insufficient Funds. — If there shall be any impairment or destruction of the drainage works by any unforeseen cause or occurrence not anticipated, during the period of construction by the contractor, the contractor shall nevertheless repair and complete the works according to the contract and specifications and shall be liable therefor and also his sureties on his bond; but if the contractor shall make default and if there shall be a failure to collect all resulting damages from such contractor and the sureties upon his bond, and it shall thereby be necessary to raise a greater sum of money to complete the drainage works in accordance with the plans, or if for any other unavoidable cause it shall be necessary to raise a greater sum to complete such drainage works, the board of drainage commissioners, having first obtained the approval of the clerk of the superior court, shall prepare new assessment rolls upon all the lands in the district upon the original basis of classification of benefits and increase the same in sufficient sums to equal the deficit thereby created, and the same shall constitute the new assessment rolls until changed according to law, and shall be certified to the tax collector as herein provided.

Additional Bonds Issued. — If for any of the causes hereinbefore recited in this section, or for any other cause, a sum of money greater than the proceeds of sale of the drainage bonds shall become necessary to complete the drainage system, and the board of drainage commissioners shall determine that the amount to be raised is greater than can be realized from the collection of one annual assessment upon the lands in the district without imposing an undue burden upon the lands, or if it is advisable or necessary to raise the money more expeditiously, then and under such conditions additional bonds may be issued in such aggregate sum as may be necessary.

Manner of Issue. — The proceedings for the issue of such additional bonds shall be substantially as follows: The board of drainage commissioners shall file their petition with the clerk of the superior court, setting forth all the facts which require the expenditure of more money and the issue of additional bonds to complete the drainage system, which shall be accompanied by the recommendation of the drainage engineer who was one of the original viewers, or some other expert drainage engineer selected by the drainage commissioners; whereupon the court shall issue a notice to all the owners of land within the district reciting the substance of the petition and directing each to appear before the court on a day certain, not less than 20 days after the service upon all the parties, and to show cause, if any they have, why the additional bonds should not be authorized, which notice shall be served personally on each such landowner by reading the same, and by leaving a copy, and if the same cannot be personally served, then it shall be served in the manner authorized by law. Any landowner may file an answer denying any material allegation in the petition or setting forth any valid objection to same before the return day thereof.Upon the day when the notice is returnable, or on such day as to which the same may have been continued, the court shall proceed to hear the petition and answers. If the court shall find that the allegations of the petition are true, and that the issue of additional bonds is advisable or necessary, the court shall make an appropriate order authorizing and directing the issue of such additional bonds, fixing the amount of such issue, the date of same, the time when the interest and principal shall be payable, and all other matters necessary and appropriate in the premises. Any landowner may appeal from the order of the clerk of the superior court, and on such appeal only the issues raised in the answer shall be considered, and such appeal and the further procedure thereon shall be as prescribed in special proceedings, except as modified by this Subchapter.After the court shall have ordered the additional issue of bonds, the further procedure as to the assessment rolls, the levying and collecting of the drainage taxes, the disbursement of the revenue therefrom for the payment of such bonds and interest thereon, and all further procedure shall be the same as required for the establishment of drainage districts. The additional bonds issued shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the total amount originally issued. The additional issue of bonds shall bear six percent (6%) interest per annum and may be made payable in 10 annual installments, or in lesser number of annual installments as nearly equal as may be, as recommended by the board of drainage commissioners and approved by the court.

History.

1909, c. 442, s. 35; 1911, c. 67, s. 15; C.S., s. 5372; 1963, c. 767, s. 4.

§ 156-117.
Subdistricts formed.

Subdistricts may be formed by owners of land in main districts theretofore established in the manner provided for the organization of main districts. Such subdistricts shall have the right to use the ditches or canals of the main districts for outlets. The formation of subdistricts shall not operate to release the lands in any subdistrict from the payment of any assessment or levy made prior to the formation of such subdistricts, nor from any assessment which may thereafter be made for the completion and maintenance of the canals in main districts, or for the payment of the principal and interest on any indebtedness incurred by the main district, nor shall it give the subdistrict any claim on the funds of such main district for its local use. It shall be the duty of the drainage commissioners of the main district to control all matters pertaining to the main district drainage. Drainage commissioners for the subdistricts shall have authority and control over all matters pertaining to drainage within their respective subdistricts, except such work as belongs exclusively to the main district.

History.

1917, c. 152, s. 8; C.S., s. 5373.

§§ 156-118 through 156-120.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1961, c. 614, s. 11.

§ 156-121.
Redress to dissatisfied landowners.

Anyone owning land which has been reclassified by the board of viewers who is dissatisfied with their classification shall have the same redress as has heretofore been provided where divisions of classification have been made by a petition to the clerk or otherwise.

History.

1923, c. 231, s. 4; C.S., s. 5373(d).

§ 156-122.
Increase to extinguish debt.

If in the opinion of the board of drainage commissioners it would help the sale of the maintenance or improvement bonds, or they would deem it necessary under the provision of

G.S. 156-101

, they may, with the approval of the clerk of the superior court, add to the amount estimated by the board of viewers a sufficient amount to pay off all outstanding obligations of the district, leaving this their only bond issue.

History.

1923, c. 231, s. 5; C.S., s. 5373(e).

§ 156-123.
Proceedings as for original bond issue.

The compensation of the board of viewers and their assistants, together with all other expenses in connection with this bond issue, shall be paid in the same manner, the duties and power of the clerk, and the duties and power of the board of drainage commissioners, the bonds shall be advertised and sold, divided into such annual installments, bear such a rate of interest, the landowners shall be given the same notices and the same rights to pay cash, the contract shall be let and supervised, and contractor paid the same, as if this was the original bond issue.

History.

1923, c. 231, s. 6; C.S., s. 5373(f).

§ 156-124.
No drainage assessments for original object may be levied on property when once paid in full.

Whenever any assessment has been made or may be made by any drainage district formed under the laws of the State of North Carolina upon any lands in said district, either for construction or maintenance of its system of drainage or for any other purpose, and the particular assessment made against any particular piece of property has been paid or shall be hereafter paid in full, then and in that event no other or further assessment may be made upon said land for the purpose of providing money for the purpose for which the original assessment was made.

History.

1933, c. 504; 1935, c. 469, s. 5.

Local Modification.

Mecklenburg: 1933, c. 504; 1935, c. 469.

§ 156-124.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1961, c. 614, s. 11.